be_BY/be-official.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3979 Y 1
SFX 3979 е оваму е
SFX 3951 Y 1
SFX 3951 т чана т
SFX 4735 Y 1
SFX 4735 а ца а
SFX 3302 Y 1
SFX 3302 а ніку а
SFX 3272 Y 1
SFX 3272 й чнае й
SFX 3270 Y 1
SFX 3270 й чнай й
SFX 4870 Y 1
SFX 4870 ы як ы
SFX 4364 Y 1
SFX 4364 у энняў у
SFX 1435 Y 1
SFX 1435 і ляўся і
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 к чнай к
SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 к чнае к
SFX 975 Y 1
SFX 975 а ік а
SFX 3271 Y 1
SFX 3271 м чнае м
SFX 3269 Y 1
SFX 3269 м чнай м
SFX 4530 Y 1
SFX 4530 т ціўшы т
SFX 302 Y 1
SFX 302 е каму е
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 е ца е
SFX 3091 Y 1
SFX 3091 т цім т
SFX 1127 Y 1
SFX 1127 у ым у
SFX 1924 Y 1
SFX 1924 е ік е
SFX 851 Y 1
SFX 851 к чкі к
SFX 3112 Y 1
SFX 3112 і ляюся і
SFX 1027 Y 1
SFX 1027 й тых й
SFX 4272 Y 1
SFX 4272 к тых к
SFX 3493 Y 1
SFX 3493 ы энняў ы
SFX 4404 Y 1
SFX 4404 м тых м
SFX 4299 Y 1
SFX 4299 й льніцкія й
SFX 3163 Y 1
SFX 3163 м стым м
SFX 1126 Y 1
SFX 1126 і яга і
